tests/possessives.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Simple possessives": 
 
    эбэ<n><px1sg><nom> : эбэм
    эбэ<n><px2sg><nom> : эбэҥ
    эбэ<n><px3sp><nom> : эбэтэ
    эбэ<n><px1pl><nom> : эбэбит
    эбэ<n><px2pl><nom> : эбэҕит
    эбэ<n><px3pl><nom> : эбэлэрэ

  "Possessive and case": 

    дьиэ<n><px1sg><nom> : дьиэм
    дьиэ<n><px1sg><dat> : дьиэбэр

    дьиэ<n><px3sp><nom> : дьиэтэ
    дьиэ<n><px3sp><acc> : дьиэтин
    дьиэ<n><px3sp><dat> : дьиэтигэр
    дьиэ<n><px3sp><abl> : дьиэтиттэн

    дьиэ<n><px1pl><nom> : дьиэбит
    дьиэ<n><px1pl><dat> : дьиэбитигэр

    дьиэ<n><px3pl><acc> : дьиэлэрин
    дьиэ<n><px3pl><dat> : дьиэлэригэр

    тыл<n><px3sg><nom> : тылы
    тыл<n><px3sg><acc> : тылын
    тыл<n><px3sg><dat> : тылыгар
    тыл<n><px3sg><abl> : тылыттан
    тыл<n><px3sg><ins> : тылынан

    аат<n><px3sg><nom> : ааты
    аат<n><px3sg><acc> : аатын
    аат<n><px3sg><dat> : аатыгар
    аат<n><px3sg><abl> : аатыттан
    аат<n><px3sg><ins> : аатынан
 
    үлэ<n><px1sg><abl> : үлэбиттэн 
    үлэ<n><px2sg><abl> : үлэҕиттэн 

  "Possessives with stem changes":

    ат<n><px1sg><dat> : аппар
    ат<n><px2sg><dat> : аккар

    күүс<n><px3sg><ins> : күүһүнэн
    күүс<n><px1pl><ins> : күүспүтүнэн

  "мать": 

    ийэ<n><px1sg><nom> : ийэм
    ийэ<n><px1sg><dat> : ийэбэр
    ийэ<n><px1sg><acc> : ийэбир
    ийэ<n><px1sg><abl> : ийэбиттэн
    ийэ<n><px1sg><ins> : ийэбинэн
    ийэ<n><px1sg><com> : ийэбиниин
    ийэ<n><px1sg><comp> : ийэбинээҕэр
    ийэ<n><px2sg><nom> : ийэҥ
    ийэ<n><px2sg><dat> : ийэҕэр
    ийэ<n><px2sg><acc> : ийэҕин
    ийэ<n><px2sg><abl> : ийэҕиттэн
    ийэ<n><px2sg><ins> : ийэҕинэн
    ийэ<n><px2sg><com> : ийэҕиниин
    ийэ<n><px2sg><comp> : ийэҕинээҕэр
    ийэ<n><px3sp><nom> : ийэтэ
    ийэ<n><px3sp><dat> : ийэтигэр
    ийэ<n><px3sp><acc> : ийэтин
    ийэ<n><px3sp><abl> : ийэтиттэн
    ийэ<n><px3sp><ins> : ийэтинэн
    ийэ<n><px3sp><com> : ийэтиниин
    ийэ<n><px3sp><comp> : ийэтинээҕэр
    ийэ<n><px1pl><nom> : ийэбит
    ийэ<n><px1pl><dat> : ийэбитигэр
    ийэ<n><px1pl><acc> : ийэбитин
    ийэ<n><px1pl><abl> : ийэбититтэн
    ийэ<n><px1pl><ins> : ийэбитинэн
    ийэ<n><px1pl><com> : ийэбитиниин
    ийэ<n><px1pl><comp> : ийэбитинээҕэр
    ийэ<n><px2pl><nom> : ийэҕит
    ийэ<n><px2pl><dat> : ийэҕитигэр
    ийэ<n><px2pl><acc> : ийэҕитин
    ийэ<n><px2pl><abl> : ийэҕититтэн
    ийэ<n><px2pl><ins> : ийэҕитинэн
    ийэ<n><px2pl><com> : ийэҕитиниин
    ийэ<n><px2pl><comp> : ийэҕитинээҕэр
    ийэ<n><px3pl><nom> : ийэлэрэ
    ийэ<n><px3pl><dat> : ийэлэригэр
    ийэ<n><px3pl><acc> : ийэлэрин
    ийэ<n><px3pl><abl> : ийэлэриттэн
    ийэ<n><px3pl><ins> : ийэлэринэн
    ийэ<n><px3pl><com> : ийэлэриниин
    ийэ<n><px3pl><comp> : ийэлэринээҕэр

  "Russian loans": 
 
    очерк<n><px3sp><par> : очерката
